California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) Protections afforded to the negotiations and contracts of the commission by the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall be applicable to the negotiations and contracts conducted or entered
 into pursuant to this section by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The authority to implement this section as set forth in this subdivision shall include the authority to give notice by provider bulletin or other similar instruction of a determination made pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and to modify or supersede existing regulations in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations that conflict with implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 2.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.1.

The commission shall be composed of seven voting members and two ex officio members. The voting members shall be selected from persons with experience in management of hospital services, risk management insurance or prepaid health programs, the delivery of health services, the management of county health systems, and a representative of recipients of service. The Directors of the Department of Health Services and the Department of Finance, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.2.

The Governor shall appoint three members of the commission, one of which shall be designated chairperson. The Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Rules Committee shall each appoint two members of the commission. Of the members first appointed by the Governor, one shall serve for a term of three years, and two for a term of two years. Of the members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Rules Committee, one appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one appointed by the Senate Rules Committee shall serve for a period of three years with the other appointees to serve for a period of two years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be
 for four-year terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.3.

The commission shall hire an executive director, legal counsel and such other staff as necessary consistent with funds appropriated in the Budget Act. All professional staff employees of the commission shall be exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that beginning July 1, 1983, the functions, powers, and duties contained in Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) become subject to the provisions contained herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 159.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.5.

The executive director shall act under the authority of the commission and shall negotiate the terms, services, and costs consistent with funds available. The commission shall serve as a review body for all contracts negotiated by the executive director. The commission may reject any proposed contract within 20 days after approval by the executive director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.6.

The commission shall direct the planning, development and negotiation of contract services which provide for:

(a) The provision of services through a capitation methodology, including, but not limited to, health maintenance organizations, organized county health systems, insurance companies, and independent practice associations.

(b) Hospital inpatient or hospital outpatient services.

(c) Pilot projects meeting the provisions of Section 14491.5.

(d) Health care projects meeting the provisions of Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.7.

All decisions of the commission shall be by a majority of four votes, including the hiring of the executive director. The commission shall retain an independent office of legal counsel for purposes of contract review. All contracts shall be reviewed by legal counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.8.

The commission shall be reimbursed at the annual salary of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), beginning on January 1, 2006. The commission shall set the salary of the executive director and other staff consistent with funds appropriated. The annual compensation provided by this section shall be increased in any fiscal year in which a general salary increase is provided for state employees. The amount of the increase provided by this section shall be comparable to, but shall not exceed, the percentage of the general salary increases provided for state employees
 during that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.9.

The commission shall report to the Legislature on January 1 and May 1 of each year. The January report shall include all of the following:

(a) The number and type of health service contracts.

(b) The persons served, cost per service, and other relevant and statistical information.

(c) The projected contract services and estimated costs.

(d) The average per diem rate received by contract hospitals,
 as of December 1 of the preceding year, shall be reported in the following categories:

(1) Statewide.

(2) By standard consolidated statistical area, as defined by the most recent United States Census.

(3) By that portion of the state not included within a standard consolidated statistical area.

(4) Statewide by hospitals with 1–99 beds, 100–299 beds, and over 300 beds.

(e) The total number of hospitals receiving a net increase, a net decrease, or having a contract rate tied to patient volume during the preceding 12 months. 

(f) A discussion of the effects of selective contracting on access to, and quality of, services. In
 preparing this portion of the report, the commission shall solicit comments from representatives of beneficiaries and providers.

The May report shall serve as an update of information contained in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of the January report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 873, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.95.

On or before February 1, 1984, the commission shall submit to the Legislature an evaluation of its inpatient hospital service procedure, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The recommended duration of contracts.

(b) The effect of the disclosure of executed contracts on the price levels of subsequently negotiated contracts.

(c) The conditions under which contractors failing to secure a contract on a first bid should be allowed to rebid.

(d) The effectiveness of contract provisions designed to ensure access to hospital services and a high quality of care.

(e) The effect of flat per diem rates on the variety of cases treated by contract hospitals.

The evaluation provided for by this section shall be accompanied by a recommendation for any relevant legislation deemed necessary by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.10.

The commission or department may direct independent studies, to include, but not be limited to, the following objectives:

(a) The development of a method of private medical insurance coverage of the Medi-Cal program as to those Medi-Cal beneficiaries whose medical costs reach a catastrophic level or who become chronically ill.

(b) The potential for Medi-Cal payment of medical coverage premiums for the various classifications of Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(c) For
 each classification of Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the provision of specified medical benefits on the basis of subsidization by the beneficiaries through the payment of premiums.

(d) A comparison of Medi-Cal benefits with the medical coverage available to most Californians not covered by Medi-Cal, along with analysis and recommendations concerning alternative benefit packages for Medi-Cal.

(e) The determination of whether health care plans providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries should offer less than the full range of Medi-Cal benefits.

(f) The development of alternative standards for beneficiary eligibility and copayment under Medi-Cal.

(g) The development of a method of response to temporary deficits in the Medi-Cal program that will both control
 expenditures and, to the extent possible, preserve the availability to beneficiaries of essential health services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 960, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.11.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections operate in the most effective and efficient manner possible when purchasing health care services for inmates. To achieve this goal, it is desirable that the department have the benefit of the experience of the California Medical Assistance Commission in planning and negotiating for the purchase of health care services.

(b) The commission may work with the Department of Corrections to assist the
 department in planning and negotiating contracts for the purchase of health care services. The commission may either consult with the department or negotiate directly with providers on behalf of the department, as mutually agreed upon by the commission and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 749, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.15. Medi-Cal Funding for South Los Angeles [14165.50. - 14165.51.]

14165.50.

(a) To facilitate the financial viability of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Community Hospital, a private nonprofit hospital that serves the population of South Los Angeles that was formerly served by the Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital, Medi-Cal funding shall, at a minimum, be made available, as specified in this section, or pursuant to mechanisms that provide equivalent funding under successor or modified Medi-Cal payment systems.

(b) Medi-Cal payment for hospital services provided by the hospital, exclusive of any payments pursuant to the
 Medi-Cal Hospital Reimbursement Improvement Act of 2013 (Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50)) or funded by another statewide hospital fee program, and exclusive of the supplemental payments specified in subdivision (d), shall include consideration of the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs for providing the services as set forth in this section.

(1) (A) Subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and notwithstanding any other law, Medi-Cal payments made to the hospital on a fee-for-service basis, including payments made pursuant to the methodology authorized under Section 14105.28 or successor or modified methodologies, shall provide compensation that is, at a minimum, equal to 100 percent of the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs for each fiscal year.

(B) To the extent
 Medi-Cal supplemental payments are necessary for any fiscal year to meet the applicable minimum reimbursement level, as described in subparagraph (A), the department shall seek federal approval, as necessary, to make the Medi-Cal supplemental payments.

(2) (A) To the extent permitted under federal law, except as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14165.51, the department shall require Medi-Cal managed care plans serving Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the County of Los Angeles to pay the hospital amounts determined necessary to meet
 compensation levels for services provided to Medi-Cal managed care enrollees that are no less than the amount
 that the hospital would have received on a fee-for-service basis pursuant to paragraph (1). The amounts shall be determined in consultation with the hospital, the County of Los Angeles, and the Medi-Cal managed care plan, and shall be subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(B) Consistent with federal law, the capitation rates paid to Medi-Cal managed care plans serving Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the County of Los Angeles shall be determined to reflect the obligations described in subparagraph (A). The increased payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans that would be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment in the absence of this paragraph shall not be reduced as a consequence of this paragraph.

(C) A Medi-Cal managed care plan receiving the increased payments described in subparagraph (B) shall not impose a fee or
 retention amount, or reduce other payments to the hospital that would result in a direct or indirect reduction to the amounts required to be paid under subparagraph (A).

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to result in payments that are less than the rates of compensation that would be payable to the hospital for Medi-Cal services without regard to the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(c) If the applicable minimum reimbursement levels required in subdivision (b) result in payments to the hospital that are above the levels of compensation that would have been payable absent that requirement, and to the extent a nonfederal share is necessary with respect to the additional compensation, the following provisions shall apply:

(1) (A) For each fiscal year through the 2016–17 fiscal
 year, General Fund amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the Medi-Cal program shall fund the nonfederal share of the additional payments to the extent that the rates of compensation for inpatient hospital services provided by the hospital that would have been payable in the absence of the requirements of subdivision (b) are less than 77 percent of the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs. With respect to the nonfederal share of the additional payments described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), however, this subparagraph shall be applicable only for inpatient services provided in conjunction with the implementation of Section 14182, and other mandatory managed care enrollment provisions implemented subsequent to January 1, 2011.

(B) For the 2017–18 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, General Fund amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the Medi-Cal program shall fund the nonfederal share of the additional
 payments to the extent that the rates of compensation for inpatient hospital services provided by the hospital that would have been payable in the absence of the requirements of subdivision (b) are less than 72 percent of the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs. With respect to the nonfederal share of the additional payments described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), however, this subparagraph shall be applicable only for inpatient services provided in conjunction with the implementation of Section 14182, and other mandatory managed care enrollment provisions implemented subsequent to January 1, 2011.

(2) (A) The remaining necessary nonfederal share of the additional payments, after taking into account the General Fund amounts described in paragraph (1), may be funded with public funds that are transferred to the state from the County of Los Angeles, at the county’s election, pursuant to Section 14164. To the extent
 the county elects not to fund any portion of the remaining necessary nonfederal share, the applicable minimum reimbursement levels required in subdivision (b) shall be reduced accordingly.

(B) Public funds transferred to the state for payments to the hospital, as described in this paragraph with respect to a fiscal period, shall be expended solely for the nonfederal share of the payments. Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (m), the department shall not impose any fee or assessment in connection with the transferred funds or the payments provided for under this section, including, but not limited to, reimbursement for state staffing or administrative costs.

(C) If any portion of the funds transferred pursuant to this paragraph is not expended, or not expected to be expended, for the specified rate amounts required in subdivision (b), the unexpended
 funds shall be returned promptly to the transferring county.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to reduce the nonfederal share of payments funded by General Fund amounts below the amounts that would be funded without regard to the minimum payment levels required under this section.

(d) (1) In addition to payments meeting the applicable minimum reimbursement levels described in subdivision (b), except as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14165.51, the hospital shall be eligible to receive supplemental payments. The supplemental payments shall be provided annually in amounts determined in consultation with the hospital and the County of Los Angeles, and subject to paragraph (3).

(2) The department shall seek federal approval, as necessary, to enable the hospital to receive supplemental payments that are in addition to the applicable minimum reimbursement levels required in subdivision (b). The supplemental payments may be provided for under the mechanisms described in Sections 14166.12 and 14301.4 or successor or modified mechanisms, or any other federally permissible payment mechanism. Supplemental payments that are payable through a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be subject to the same requirements described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(3) If a nonfederal share is necessary to fund the supplemental payments, the County of Los Angeles may voluntarily provide public funds that are transferred to the state pursuant to Section 14164. The county may specify the type of supplemental payment for which it is transferring funds, and any
 other category relevant to the payment, including, but not limited to, fee-for-service supplemental payment, managed care rate range payment, and payment for services rendered to newly eligible beneficiaries as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 17612.2.

(4) Public funds transferred to the state for supplemental payments to the hospital, as described in this subdivision with respect to a fiscal period, shall be expended solely for the nonfederal share of the supplemental payments as specified pursuant to paragraph (3). Notwithstanding any other law, subdivision (o) of Section 14166.12 shall not apply, and the department shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4, or any other similar fee, except as provided in subdivision (m). If any portion of the funds transferred pursuant to this subdivision is not expended, or not expected to be expended, for the specified supplemental payments, the unexpended funds shall be
 returned promptly to the transferring county.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, all payments provided for under this section shall be treated as having been paid for purposes of any determination of available room under the federal upper payment limit, as specified in Part 447 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, with respect to the applicable class of services and class of health care provider.

(f) For purposes of this article,
 the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Hospital” means a health facility that is certified under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code to provide acute inpatient hospital services, and includes all components of the facility, with an inpatient hospital service location on the campus of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Community Hospital.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care
 services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(g) For purposes of this article, the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs shall be based on the cost finding principles applied under subdivision (b) of Section 14166.4, except that the projected costs shall not be multiplied by the federal medical assistance percentage and are not subject to the reimbursement limitations set forth in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 51536) of Chapter 3 of Subdivision 1 of Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The projected Medi-Cal costs shall be determined prior to the start of each fiscal year in consultation with the hospital, using the best available and reasonable current estimates or projections made with respect to the hospital for an annual period, and shall be considered final as of the start of the fiscal year for
 purposes of the minimum payment levels described in subdivision (b).

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the hospital shall not be eligible to receive payments pursuant to Section 14166.11. This subdivision, however, shall not be construed to preclude the hospital from eligibility for disproportionate share status, or from receipt of any federal Medicaid disproportionate share hospital payments to which it would be entitled, pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(i) Except as specified in subdivision (h) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14165.51, this section shall not be construed to preclude the hospital from receiving any other payment for which it is eligible in addition
 to the payments provided for by this section.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1) of Chapter 6 of Part 5, the intergovernmental transfers described in this section as reflected in the actual net expenditures for all operating budget units of the County of Los Angeles Department of Health Services shall not be reduced in any manner in the determination of total costs under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 17612.5, by application of the imputed other entity intergovernmental transfer amounts or otherwise.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of all-facility letters, all-county letters, or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory
 action. This section shall not be construed to preclude the department from adopting regulations.

(l) (1) The department shall obtain federal approvals or waivers as necessary to implement this section and to obtain federal matching funds to the maximum extent permitted by federal law. This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and this section does not jeopardize the federal financial participation available for any other state program.

(2) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals are obtained.

(m) As part of its voluntary participation to provide the nonfederal share of payments under this section, the County of Los Angeles shall agree to reimburse the state for
 the nonfederal share of state staffing and administrative costs directly attributable to the cost of administrating the payments and associated intergovernmental
 transfers pursuant to this section. The costs shall be documented and subject to review by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 999, Sec. 7.   (AB 177)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.51.

(a) (1) For dates of service commencing no later than January 1, 2026, the department shall establish a Medi-Cal managed care directed payment reimbursement methodology in accordance with Section 438.6(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations applicable to the hospital.

(2) The directed payment reimbursement methodology shall, at minimum:

(A) Provide reimbursement for contracted hospital inpatient services such that aggregate managed care reimbursement to the hospital for hospital inpatient services, exclusive of any payments pursuant to Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50), is projected by the department to be at least equal to 72
 percent of the hospital’s projected Medi-Cal costs for hospital inpatient services associated with the implementation of Section 14182, and other mandatory managed care enrollment provisions implemented subsequent to January 1, 2011.

(B) Provide additional reimbursements to the hospital for contracted hospital inpatient and hospital outpatient services in a form and manner that is projected by the department to total twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) annually in addition to the amount described in subparagraph (A).

(C) Align with the goals and objectives of the department’s comprehensive quality strategy.

(D) To the extent appropriate, link payments to value and outcomes, consistent with measures selected by the department consistent with subparagraph (C), in addition to access to and utilization of
 services.

(E) Be developed with consideration of the stability of the hospital’s cash flow.

(F) Be developed in consultation with the hospital.

(3) (A) The department shall, annually on a prospective basis, make the projections pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2), and may develop the projections on either an aggregate or individual service level, or both.

(B) The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and the hospital to submit information regarding contract rates and expected or actual utilization of services, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(C) In the event payments to the hospital at the level set
 forth in paragraph (2), in combination with any other reimbursement, exceed any federal statutory or regulatory limits on Medicaid reimbursement, the amount of payments that the Medi-Cal managed care plans make shall be reduced to comply with the applicable federal limitation.

(D) In establishing the reimbursement methodology pursuant to paragraph (1) and the parameters for Medi-Cal managed care plans in the County of Los Angeles to make increased payments to the hospital pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall consider strategies that are designed to result in the hospital receiving the payments pursuant to this section as quickly as practicable and on an ongoing or periodic basis that supports the stability of the hospital’s cash flow.

(4) To the extent necessary to meet the objectives identified in paragraph (2) or to comply with federal requirements, the department
 may, in consultation with the hospital, adjust or modify the directed payment reimbursement methodology to meet applicable federal requirements and be consistent with actuarial rate development principles and standards.

(b) (1) Medi-Cal managed care plans in the County of Los Angeles shall increase payments to the hospital in accordance with the requirements of the directed payment methodology established by the department pursuant to this section and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), this section shall not be construed to preclude the hospital from receiving any other payment for which it is eligible in addition to the payments provided for by this section.

(3) For any dates of service for which this section is implemented, in whole or in
 part, and notwithstanding any other law, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not be required to make any payments pursuant to Section 14165.50.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(d) (1) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section.

(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available
 and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) (1) The nonfederal share of increases to Medi-Cal managed care plan capitation rates made in accordance with this section shall be funded using General Fund moneys or other state funds appropriated to the department as the state share in the annual Budget Act.

(2) Implementation of this section in each applicable fiscal year is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for the express purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 999, Sec. 8.   (AB 177)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.17. Nondesignated Public Hospital Medi-Cal Rate Stabilization Act [14165.55. - 14165.57.]

14165.55.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Bad debt charges” means deductions from revenue for bad debt.

(b) “Charity care charges” means deductions from revenue for charity care.

(c) “Contract Hospital” means a nondesignated public hospital, which has a
 Medi-Cal fee-for-service contract negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission in effect as of December 31 of the applicable state fiscal year.

(d) “Contract Hospital allocation” means the portion of the Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool that is allocated to and transferred to the state by the transferring entity on behalf of the contract hospitals.

(e) “Converted hospital” means a private hospital that becomes a designated public hospital or a nondesignated public hospital on or after July 1 of any state fiscal year, a nondesignated public hospital that becomes a private hospital or a designated public hospital on or after July 1 of any state fiscal year, or a designated public hospital that becomes a private hospital or a nondesignated public hospital on or after July 1 of any state fiscal year. A hospital shall be considered a converted hospital only for the
 fiscal year during which it became a converted hospital.

(f) “Intergovernmental transfer (IGT)” means the transfer of public funds by the public entity to the state in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(g) “Intergovernmental transfer allocation” or “IGT allocation” means the amount of the Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool allocated to a nondesignated public hospital for a state fiscal year. Each transferring entity may agree to transfer its IGT allocation to the state in order to participate in the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Program in accordance with this section and Section 14164.

(h) “Intergovernmental transfer formula group” or “IGT formula group” means any of the following groups:

(1) Contract
 Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between seven and nine, inclusive.

(2) Contract Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between four and six, inclusive.

(3) Contract Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between one and three, inclusive.

(4) Non-Contract Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between seven and nine, inclusive.

(5) Non-Contract Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between four and six, inclusive.

(6) Non-Contract Hospitals that have an IGT Formula Score of between one and three, inclusive.

(i) “New nondesignated hospital” means a hospital that was not in operation under
 current or prior ownership as a nondesignated public hospital for any portion of the calendar year prior to July 1 of any state fiscal year. A hospital shall be considered a new hospital only for the fiscal year during which it began operating.

(j) “Non-Contract Hospital” means a nondesignated public hospital, which does not have a Medi-Cal fee-for-service contract negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission in effect as of December 31 of the applicable state fiscal year.

(k) “Non-Contract Hospital allocation” means the portion of the Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool that is allocated to and transferred to the state by the transferring entity on behalf of the Non-Contract Hospitals.

(l) “Nondesignated public hospital” means either of the following:

(1) A public hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s latest annual Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development (OSHPD) financial disclosure report for the hospital, and satisfies the definition in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, excluding designated public hospitals, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1 as that section may be amended from time to time.

(2) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s latest annual OSHPD financial disclosure report, is a hospital operated, owned, or both by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district hospital owner by means of the
 district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(m) “Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Pool” or “Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool” means the pool of funds that will be utilized as the state’s share of the aggregate payments funded by the transferring entity’s intergovernmental transfers for a state fiscal year. This amount shall be calculated based on the room under the federal Upper Payment Limit (UPL) in the category of Non-State Government Owned Hospitals (Inpatient) which the department has determined is both attributable to the nondesignated public hospitals and available for the purposes of this article as determined by the department pursuant to Section 14165.56.

(n) “Public entity” means the transferring entity, which may be a city, county, special purpose district, or other governmental unit in the state, regardless of
 whether the unit of government is also a health care provider, except as prohibited by federal law.

(o) “Transferring entity” means a public entity that transfers public funds to the state in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 14165.57 and is a public entity as defined in subdivision (n).

(p) “Upper payment limit” or “UPL” means the federal upper payment limit category as defined in Sections 447.272 and 447.321 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the amount of the Medicaid payments for which federal financial participation is available for a class of service and a class of health care providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   (AB 113)   Effective April 13, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.56.

(a) The department shall establish, implement, and maintain the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Program to provide supplemental payments to nondesignated public hospitals in a manner that maximizes federal financial participation in the resulting supplemental payments. The department shall develop and implement the program subject to receiving all federal approvals.

(b) Upon receiving federal approval, the department shall fully implement this section beginning with the 2010–11 fiscal year. The department shall perform all acts necessary to secure the maximum level of federal financial participation for payments resulting from the Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool. The department shall make every effort to implement this section for the 2010–11 fiscal year so that all allocations will be determined, all intergovernmental transfers will be received by the state, and federal financial participation will be drawn in order for the department to make payments due to each nondesignated public hospital prior to July 1, 2011.

(c) By August 1 of each fiscal year, beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year and every year thereafter, the department shall provide an estimate of the Non-State Government Owned Hospital (Inpatient) UPL associated with the
 inpatient fee-for-service payments to nondesignated public hospitals in order to establish both the UPL and the available room under the UPL. The department may make supplemental inpatient fee-for-service payments to nondesignated public hospitals using some or all of the shortfall level below the UPL. The amount identified by the department as available for those payments shall be multiplied by 100 percent minus the annual federal medical assistance percentage, as defined in Part 433 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and shall be the amount available in the Nondesignated Public Hospital Intergovernmental Transfer Pool. The payments made pursuant to this article may be funded using public entity intergovernmental transfers and associated federal financial participation.

(d) Once the department has estimated the UPL and the potential supplemental payment relating to nondesignated public hospitals, the department shall use the IGT
 allocation formula described in Section 14165.57 to determine the estimated IGT allocation for each nondesignated public hospital from the Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool using the most recent data publicly available from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), and the federal Health Resources and Services Administration (HRSA).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 217.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.57.

(a) The IGT allocation formula shall use data from each nondesignated public hospital’s latest Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report on file with OSHPD as of March 1 of each prior fiscal year and shall be as follows:

(1) The Nondesignated Public Hospital IGT Pool shall be allocated into two allocations: the Contract Hospitals allocation and the Non-Contract Hospitals allocation. This allocation shall be made to each group, respectively, based upon the ratio of Medi-Cal fee-for-service acute patient days listed in the latest OSHPD Annual Financial Disclosure Report for Contract Hospitals and Non-Contract Hospitals to the total Medi-Cal fee-for-service acute patient days provided by all Contract Hospitals and Non-Contract Hospitals. Medi-Cal
 fee-for-service acute patient days for converted hospitals and new hospitals will not be included in this allocation.

(2) The department shall determine if a nondesignated public hospital provides services in either a federally recognized Health Professional Shortage Area or to a federally recognized Medically Underserved Area or Population. The department shall also determine if the nondesignated public hospital is federally recognized as either a Critical Access Hospital or a Sole Community Provider. If any of these conditions apply, the hospital shall score one point. Otherwise, the hospital shall score zero points.
